Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 5. Workforce

§ 3541.
Scholarships for current early childhood providers.

There is established a need-based scholarship program for individuals employed by a regulated, privately operated center-based child care program or family child care home while acquiring credits in early childhood development or that are related directly to working with children from birth through eight years of age.

The Department for Children and Families may contract for the administration of the program set forth in subsection (a) of this section and adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary for its implementation.

Scholarships distributed pursuant to this section shall be available on a first-come, first-served basis until any appropriated funds are depleted.

Subsection (d) repealed effective July 1, 2026.

An individual shall not simultaneously participate in the scholarship program set forth in this section and the student loan repayment assistance program set forth in section 3543 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 45

, § 6.

§ 3542. Section 3542 repealed effective July 1, 2026. Scholarships for prospective early childhood providers.

There is established a need-based scholarship program for individuals pursuing a college degree in early childhood education or early childhood special education. The scholarship program shall provide financial assistance up to the full cost of tuition for an eligible individual.
(a) (1) There is established a need-based scholarship program for individuals pursuing a college degree in early childhood education or early childhood special education. The scholarship program shall provide financial assistance up to the full cost of tuition for an eligible individual.

An eligible individual shall:

attend a Vermont college or university at least part-time;

be pursuing an associates or bachelor’s degree in early childhood education or early childhood special education; and

commit to working in a regulated, privately operated center-based child care program or family child care home in Vermont for years equal to those in which scholarship monies are sought under this section.

The Department for Children and Families shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary for implementation of the program described in subsection (a) of this section.
(b) (1) The Department for Children and Families shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary for implementation of the program described in subsection (a) of this section.

The Department may contract for the administration of the program. Administration costs shall not be more than 10 percent of the total appropriation received to implement this section.

Scholarships distributed pursuant to this section shall be available on a first-come, first-served basis until any appropriated funds are depleted.
(c) (1) Scholarships distributed pursuant to this section shall be available on a first-come, first-served basis until any appropriated funds are depleted.

An eligible individual who does not work the required number of years in a regulated, privately operated center-based child care program or family child care home in Vermont after completion of the individual’s degree program shall repay scholarship monies received under this section commensurate with the balance of the eligible individual’s time commitment.

An individual shall not simultaneously participate in the scholarship program set forth in this section and the student loan repayment assistance program set forth in section 3543 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 45

, § 6.

§ 3543. Section 3543 repealed effective July 1, 2026. Student loan repayment assistance.

There is established a need-based student loan repayment assistance program for the purpose of providing student loan repayment assistance to any individual employed by a regulated, privately operated center-based child care program or family child care home.
(a) (1) There is established a need-based student loan repayment assistance program for the purpose of providing student loan repayment assistance to any individual employed by a regulated, privately operated center-based child care program or family child care home.

An eligible individual shall:

work in a privately operated center-based child care program or in a family child care home that is regulated by the Division for at least an average of 30 hours per week for 48 weeks of the year;

receive an annual salary of not more than $50,000.00; and

have earned an associates or bachelor’s degree with a major concentration in early childhood, child and human development, elementary education, special education with a birth to age eight focus, or child and family services within the preceding five years.

To participate in the program set forth in this section, an eligible individual shall submit to the Department for Children and Families documentation expressing the individual’s intent to work in a regulated, privately operated center-based child care program or family child care home for at least the 12 months following the annual loan repayment award notification. A participant may receive up to $4,000.00 annually in student loan repayment assistance, which shall be distributed by the Department in four allotments. The Department shall distribute at least one-quarter of the individual’s total annual benefit after the individual has completed three months of employment in accordance with the program. The remainder of an individual’s total annual benefit shall be distributed by the Department every three months after the initial payment.

The Department shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
(b) (1) The Department shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Student loan repayments shall be available pursuant to this section on a first-come, first-served basis until appropriated funds are depleted.

The Department may contract for the administration of the program. Administration costs shall not be more than 10 percent of the total appropriation received to implement this section.

An individual shall not simultaneously participate in the student loan repayment assistance program set forth in this section and either of the scholarship programs set forth in section 3541 or 3542 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 45

, § 6.